Washington statutes.
RCW 36.110.090

City or county special revenue funds.

A city or a county that implements a jail industries program may establish a separate fund for the operation of the program. This fund shall be a special revenue fund with continuing authority to receive income and pay expenses associated with the jail industries program.

[ 1993 c 285 s 9.]